Connecticut, session 2026, SB00302.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 36a-34 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The commissioner shall not grant any approval under section 36a-
125, subsections (b), (c) and (d) of section 36a-145, as amended by this
act, section 36a-181, section 36a-411 or subdivisions (1) and (2) of
subsection (a) of section 36a-412 unless the commissioner finds, in
accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 54, that (1)
based on the most recent applicable performance evaluation and any
related information required by the commissioner, the entity has a
record of compliance with the requirements of federal CRA, sections
36a-30 to 36a-33, inclusive, to the extent applicable, and applicable
consumer protection laws; and (2) except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, if the entity, and in the case of an approval pursuant to
section 36a-411, the bank or any subsidiary bank of the Connecticut
holding company, received any overall rating other than an assigned
rating of "outstanding" on its most recent applicable community
reinvestment performance evaluation, or, in the case of an approval
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 302
under subsection (b), (c) or (d) of section 36a-145, as amended by this
act, if the entity received an overall rating of "needs to improve" or
"substantial noncompliance" on its most recent applicable community
reinvestment performance evaluation, the resulting entity will provide
adequate services to meet the banking needs of all community residents,
including low-income residents and moderate-income residents to the
extent permitted by its charter, in accordance with a plan submitted by
the applicant to the commissioner, in such form and containing such
information as the commissioner may require, or, if acceptable to the
commissioner, in accordance with an approved strategic plan prepared
under federal CRA, or the relevant portion thereof, that is submitted by
the applicant to the commissioner. Upon receiving any such plan, the
commissioner shall make the plan available for public inspection and
comment at the Department of Banking and cause notice of its
submission and availability for inspection and comment to be published
in the department's weekly bulletin. With the concurrence of the
commissioner, the applicant or applicants shall publish, in the form of a
legal advertisement in a newspaper having a substantial circulation in
the area, notice of such plan's submission and availability for public
inspection and comment. The notice shall state that the inspection and
comment period will last for a period of thirty days from the date of
publication. The commissioner shall not make such finding until the
expiration of such thirty-day period. In making such finding, the
commissioner shall, unless clearly inapplicable, consider, among other
factors, whether the plan identifies specific unmet credit and consumer
banking needs in the local community and specifies how such needs will
be satisfied, provides for sufficient distribution of banking services
among branches or satellite devices, or both, located in low-income
neighborhoods, contains adequate assurances that banking services will
be offered on a nondiscriminatory basis and demonstrates a
commitment to extend credit for housing, small business and consumer
purposes in low-income neighborhoods. The submission of such plan
shall not be required in the case of an approval under subsection (d) of
section 36a-145, provided, the commissioner may require the filing of
such information in lieu of a plan as the commissioner deems
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 302
appropriate. If the commissioner determines that an applicant is an
eligible entity, the commissioner may (A) exempt such applicant from
the requirement that such applicant file a plan, or (B) require such
information in lieu of a plan as the commissioner deems appropriate.
Except with respect to an approval pursuant to section 36a-145, as
amended by this act, and section 36a-181, the commissioner shall not
approve the transaction if the transaction would result in a monopoly,
or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to
monopolize or attempt to monopolize the business of banking in this
state or if the commissioner determines that the effect of the proposed
transaction may be to substantially lessen competition, or would tend to
create a monopoly, or would be in restraint of trade, unless the
commissioner finds that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed
transaction are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable
effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the
community to be served.
Sec. 2. Subsection (n) of section 36a-145 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(n) Upon receipt of an application pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (b) of this section, subdivisions (1) and (4) of subsection (c)
of this section, subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of this section or
subsection (j) of this section, the commissioner shall cause notice of the
application to be published in the department's weekly bulletin. The
commissioner shall determine whether the applicant is an eligible
entity, as defined in section 36a-34, as amended by this act, and shall
promptly notify the applicant of such determination. An application by
an eligible entity shall be deemed approved on the [twelfth] fifth
business day after expiration of the comment period provided in the
department's weekly bulletin, unless the commissioner informs the
applicant, in writing, prior to such [twelfth] fifth business day, that (1)
an adverse comment has been received that warrants additional
investigation or review; (2) the application presents a significant
community reinvestment or compliance concern; (3) the application
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 302
presents a significant supervisory concern or raises significant legal or
policy issues; or (4) the application requires additional information. The
application may be deemed approved prior to the expiration of the
[twelfth] fifth business day if the commissioner issues a written notice
of the commissioner's intent not to disapprove the application.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 36a-34(b)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 36a-145(n)
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4